Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.728

Applicability of general receivership law.

Except in cases in which a receiver is appointed by a court on a temporary basis under RCW 31.12.721, the provisions of Title 7 RCW generally applicable to receivers and receiverships do not apply to receivers elected or appointed under this chapter.

[ 2004 c 165 s 42.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.